test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-04ainus_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - `ainus3: # Adjective (17,8,4) `ainus1-3 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ainus+A+Sg+Nom: ainus
     ainus+A+Sg+Gen: [ainu, ainusõ]
     ainus+A+Sg+Par: [ainut, ainust]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ill: [ainuhe, ainustõ]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ine: [ainun, ainuh, ainuhn, ainusõn, ainusõh, ainusõhn]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ela: [ainust, ainusõst]
     ainus+A+Sg+All: [ainulõ, ainusõlõ]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ade: [ainul, ainusõl]
     ainus+A+Sg+Abl: [ainult, ainusõlt]
     ainus+A+Sg+Tra: [ainus, ainusõs]
     ainus+A+Sg+Ter: [ainuniq, ainusõniq]
     ainus+A+Sg+Abe: [ainuldaq, ainusõldaq]
     ainus+A+Sg+Com: [ainugaq, ainusõgaq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Nom: [ainuq, ainusõq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Gen: [ainuidõ, ainuisi, ainustõ]
     ainus+A+Pl+Par: [ainuid, ainuisi]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ill: [ainuihe, ainuidõ, ainustõhe, ainustõdõ, ainuisihe, ainuisi, ainuisidõ]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ine: [ainuin, ainuih, ainuihn, ainustõn, ainustõh, ainustõhn, ainuisih, ainuisihn, ainuisin]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ela: [ainuist, ainustõst, ainuisist]
     ainus+A+Pl+All: [ainuilõ, ainustõlõ, ainuisilõ]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ade: [ainuil, ainustõl, ainuisil]
     ainus+A+Pl+Abl: [ainuilt, ainustõlt, ainuisilt]
     ainus+A+Pl+Tra: [ainuis, ainustõs, ainuisis]
     ainus+A+Pl+Ter: [ainuiniq, ainustõniq, ainuisiniq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Abe: [ainuildaq, ainustõldaq, ainuisildaq]
     ainus+A+Pl+Com: [ainuidõgaq, ainustõgaq, ainuisigaq]

     ainus+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ainumb, ainump, ainup]
